District of Columbia statutes.
5-1002

Attendance of witnesses — Wilful false swearing.

Any wilful false swearing on the part of any witness before any trial board mentioned in § 5-1001 as to any material fact shall be deemed perjury and shall be punished in the manner prescribed by law for such offense.

History

May 11, 1892, 27 Stat. 29, ch. 65, § 2
Feb. 20, 1896, 29 Stat. 10, ch. 25, § 2
Apr. 16, 1932, 47 Stat. 87, ch. 118, § 3

Cross References

Insanitary buildings, condemnation, condemnation review board, see § 6-902.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-902.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-802.
1973 Ed., § 4-602.